New York, session 2025-2026, S4478.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 137-a to 2 read as follows: 3 § 137-a. Workplace rights document. The department shall develop, and 4 make available to school officials, a workplace rights document to be 5 provided to minors seeking an employment certificate or permit pursuant 6 to article sixty-five of the education law. Such document shall clearly 7 explain basic labor rights extended to workers, and express such labor 8 rights in plain terminology, easily understood by a minor. The workplace 9 rights document shall be made available on the department's website and 10 translated by the department in the ten most commonly spoken languages 11 in the state or any language otherwise requested by the minor seeking 12 the employment certificate or permit. Topics covered in such workplace 13 rights document shall include, but not be limited to, local, state, and 14 federal laws regarding each of the following issues: (i) child labor; 15 (ii) wage and hour protections; (iii) worker safety; (iv) workers' 16 compensation; (v) paid sick leave; (vi) prohibitions against retali- 17 ation; and (vii) the right to organize a union in the workplace. Any 18 minor seeking an employment certificate or permit shall be issued, 19 before or at the time of receiving such employment certificate or 20 permit, the workplace rights document. The document shall be produced to 21 a minor in physical form. 22 § 2. Section 3215-a of the education law is amended by adding a new 23 subdivision 4 to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08826-01-5 S. 4478 2 1 4. Employment certificates or permits issued to students shall include 2 the workplace rights document pursuant to section one hundred thirty- 3 seven-a of the labor law. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 5 have become a law.